fi_FI.dic
Berliinissä/T
Chilessä/T
Eestissä/T
Hitlerissä/T
Internetixissä/T
Jyväskylässä/T
Krimissä/T
Nurmijärvessä/T
Pohjois-Hämeessä/T
Virittäjä-lehdessä/T
Webissä/T
aaltopelleissä/T
aamuhetkessä/T
aamulähetyksessä/T
aamulämmöissä/T
aamupäivissä/T
aamuyössä/T
afääreissä/T
ahaa-elämyksessä/T
ahdasmielisessä/T
ahdasmielisyydessä/T
aikajärjestyksessä/T
aikatöissä/T
alaviitteissä/T
alkuerässä/T
alkuperäisissä/T
alkuräjähdyksessä/T
altimetrissä/T
analyyseissä/T
asiakielessä/T
asiateksteissä/T
asiatyylisissä/T
avovesissä/T
biiseissä/T
binaariryhmissä/T
bändissä/T
defektissä/T
designissä/T
diskreetissä/T
edellisissä/T
edellyttävissä/T
eettisessä/T
efektissä/T
ehkäisyssä/T
ehtineissä/T
ei-finiittisissä/T
eksyneessä/T
eliitissä/T
elimistössä/T
eliössä/T
eläimissä/T
eläkkeessä/T
emännässä/T
enemmässä/T
englanninkielisessä/T
enimmässä/T
ensimmäisissä/T
entisissä/T
epäileväisissä/T
epäilyssä/T
epämääräisessä/T
erehdyksessä/T
erillisessä/T
erissä/T
eritetyissä/T
eriyttämisessä/T
erässä/T
esimerkkivirkkeissä/T
esitelmissä/T
esitetyssä/T
esitteissä/T
esittämisessä/T
esityksessä/T
esseessä/T
estämisessä/T
eteisessä/T
etelässä/T
etsimessä/T
etsineessä/T
etunenässä/T
eturivissä/T
etäisyydessä/T
filmeissä/T
finiittisissä/T
fyysisessä/T
geenissä/T
geosentrisessä/T
hedelmässä/T
helvetissä/T
hengessä/T
henkilöissä/T
henkisessä/T
herkkyydessä/T
heräämässä/T
hetkellisessä/T
hetkissä/T
hikisessä/T
hillityimmissä/T
hillityssä/T
hirveässä/T
hississä/T
hylkeissä/T
hylätyissä/T
hypyssä/T
hyrinässä/T
hytissä/T
hyväksytyssä/T
hyytelössä/T
hyörinässä/T
häilyvässä/T
häissä/T
hälyssä/T
hämyssä/T
hämärässä/T
häviämässä/T
häätämässä/T
hötäkässä/T
i'issä/T
identiteetissä/T
idässä/T
ihmisessä/T
ikeessä/T
ikäisessä/T
ikävässä/T
ilmahyökkäyksessä/T
ilmeisessä/T
ilmiöissä/T
imevässä/T
intiimissä/T
irvivässä/T
isyydessä/T
itsessä/T
itäisissä/T
jengissä/T
johtoryhmässä/T
juryssä/T
jylhässä/T
jyrkässä/T
jäissä/T
jäljessä/T
jämerässä/T
järjestelmässä/T
järjestettävissä/T
järjestössä/T
järkevässä/T
järvissä/T
jäsennyksessä/T
jättäjissä/T
jättämässä/T
jäykässä/T
jäämässä/T
jääneissä/T
kaakkoishämäläisissä/T
kansainvälisessä/T
kanssakäymisessä/T
kehittymisessä/T
kehittämisessä/T
kehyksissä/T
keihäässä/T
kelissä/T
kengässä/T
kepissä/T
keskeisessä/T
keskinäisissä/T
keskiössä/T
kesäisessä/T
kesässä/T
kesäyössä/T
kevlarkypärissä/T
keväisissä/T
keväässä/T
kielellisissä/T
kielissä/T
kielletyssä/T
kielteisissä/T
kierteessä/T
kiihtyneessä/T
kiintiössä/T
kiireellisessä/T
kiireysjärjestyksessä/T
kiperissä/T
kipsissä/T
kirjeessä/T
kirjoitustehtävissä/T
kirjoitustöissä/T
kivessä/T
kivissä/T
kotimetsässä/T
kreivissä/T
kriisissä/T
kyhmyissä/T
kylissä/T
kyljissä/T
kylmässä/T
kylvyssä/T
kymmenissä/T
kypsymässä/T
kypärässä/T
kyseisessä/T
kyselyssä/T
kysymyksissä/T
kytkennässä/T
kyvyissä/T
kyydissä/T
kyyryssä/T
kämmenessä/T
kämpissä/T
kärjessä/T
kärkevissä/T
kärryissä/T
kärsivässä/T
käsitettävissä/T
kätköissä/T
kättelyssä/T
käydyissä/T
käymissä/T
käyneissä/T
käynnistyksessä/T
käytettävissä/T
käyttäytymisessä/T
käytännöllisessä/T
käytöksessä/T
käyvissä/T
käännettävässä/T
käännössä/T
käänteissä/T
kääntämisessä/T
kömpelössä/T
köyhissä/T
köyhässä/T
lehdessä/T
lehdistössä/T
leikissä/T
leireissä/T
leivissä/T
lemmikissä/T
lentämässä/T
leppeässä/T
lepäävässä/T
levyissä/T
leväkössä/T
liemessä/T
liikenteessä/T
liikkeissä/T
liitteissä/T
limiitissä/T
lisäämässä/T
lumitöissä/T
lyhentämisessä/T
lyhyissä/T
lykyssä/T
lyömässä/T
lyötävässä/T
lyövässä/T
läheisessä/T
läheisyydessä/T
lähestymässä/T
lähettämässä/T
lähimmässä/T
lähiössä/T
lähteissä/T
läjässä/T
lämmössä/T
lämpimässä/T
lännessä/T
läntisissä/T
lääkärissä/T
läänissä/T
läävässä/T
löytymässä/T
löytämässä/T
melskeissä/T
menetelmässä/T
menneisyydessä/T
merissä/T
merkittävässä/T
merkityksissä/T
metreissä/T
metsissä/T
metsästämässä/T
miehisessä/T
mielessä/T
mielissä/T
miljöössä/T
myllyssä/T
myrskyssä/T
myydyssä/T
myymässä/T
myöhässä/T
mäessä/T
männikössä/T
märässä/T
määrissä/T
määrittelemisessä/T
määrittämisessä/T
määrityksessä/T
määrässä/T
määrätyssä/T
mölyssä/T
neljissä/T
nenissä/T
nesteessä/T
niemessä/T
nimennössä/T
nimetyissä/T
nimisessä/T
nimistössä/T
nykyhetkessä/T
nykyisissä/T
nykypuhekielessä/T
nyrkissä/T
näkemyksessä/T
näkyvissä/T
nälässä/T
näyssä/T
näytteessä/T
oikeakielisyydessä/T
omaperäisessä/T
oripäässä/T
pehmeissä/T
peileissä/T
peleissä/T
pelkässä/T
penkissä/T
perheessä/T
perimässä/T
perityissä/T
peräkkäisissä/T
pesissä/T
pettämässä/T
pidetyssä/T
pienemmässä/T
pienimässä/T
piireissä/T
piirteessä/T
pilvenpiirtäjissä/T
pilvisessä/T
pimeissä/T
pimeässä/T
pirtissä/T
pisteissä/T
pitkissä/T
pitseissä/T
pitäjässä/T
pohjoisryhmässä/T
polkumerkinnöissä/T
puoliyössä/T
pyhissä/T
pyhässä/T
pykälässä/T
pyryssä/T
pysyvässä/T
pyytämässä/T
pyörivissä/T
pyörässä/T
päivissä/T
päivässä/T
päreessä/T
pätkässä/T
pääsemisessä/T
pääteltävissä/T
päätteellisessä/T
päätteettömässä/T
pölkyssä/T
pölyttymässä/T
pörsseissä/T
pötkimässä/T
pöydässä/T
reessä/T
rei'issä/T
rekistereissä/T
remmissä/T
repäisyssä/T
retkessä/T
revyyssä/T
riittävässä/T
ringissä/T
rinteissä/T
ristissä/T
riveissä/T
runokielessä/T
ryhmissä/T
ryhtymässä/T
rypyssä/T
rytinässä/T
ryypyssä/T
räiskeessä/T
rämettymässä/T
rännissä/T
sanomalehdessä/T
seinissä/T
seinämässä/T
seitissä/T
sekeissä/T
selittävässä/T
selkeässä/T
sellissä/T
selvitettävissä/T
selvittämisessä/T
selvässä/T
sementissä/T
senttimetrissä/T
seteleissä/T
sienessä/T
sievässä/T
siirtymässä/T
siivessä/T
sileässä/T
silmänräpäyksessä/T
sinisessä/T
sisimmässä/T
sisäisissä/T
sisätöissä/T
sitkeässä/T
sketseissä/T
suhuässässä/T
suomenkielisissä/T
suovesissä/T
suurmäessä/T
sydämessä/T
syissä/T
sykkivässä/T
syklissä/T
syleilyssä/T
symmetrisessä/T
synnyssä/T
syrjässä/T
systeemissä/T
syvimmässä/T
syvyydessä/T
syvässä/T
syyssä/T
syytteessä/T
syytämässä/T
syömisessä/T
syömässä/T
syövässä/T
säiliöissä/T
säilyneissä/T
säilössä/T
säkeissä/T
sängyssä/T
särkymässä/T
sättimässä/T
sävyssä/T
säädössä/T
säännössä/T
taidenäyttelyissä/T
tehneissä/T
tekemisessä/T
teknillisessä/T
teksteissä/T
tentissä/T
termistötyössä/T
testeissä/T
tiessä/T
tietyissä/T
tiiviissä/T
tileissä/T
tyhjiössä/T
tylsässä/T
typessä/T
tytössä/T
tyylissä/T
työnnössä/T
tähdissä/T
täissä/T
tärkeässä/T
täysissä/T
törmäyksessä/T
uutisryhmässä/T
vekseleissä/T
venheessä/T
verbeissä/T
verissä/T
vetämissä/T
viesteissä/T
vihkiäisissä/T
viihteessä/T
viimeisessä/T
viiveessä/T
vireässä/T
virkakielipäätöksessä/T
virneessä/T
vyöryssä/T
väestössä/T
vähissä/T
väitetyssä/T
välierässä/T
välisessä/T
väljemmässä/T
väreissä/T
väärässä/T
yhdistämässä/T
yhteisissä/T
yhteydessä/T
yhtyeissä/T
yhtälössä/T
yksikössä/T
yksittäisissä/T
yleisissä/T
yleisössä/T
ylläpitämisessä/T
yläpäässä/T
ympyrässä/T
ympäröivässä/T
ystävässä/T
yöpöydässä/T
älykkäässä/T
ärsyttävässä/T
ässässä/T
äänestyksessä/T
äärellisessä/T
öljyissä/T
